it: Tipo di protezione del trampolino: Rete di protezione ad arco/senza pali; Rete di protezione all’interno delle molle; Rete di protezione all’esterno delle molle; Rete fissata al tappeto elastico (senza molle); Nessuna rete di protezione; Altro
vi: Loại khung bao quanh bạt nhún: Lưới quây không cần khung/cột; Lưới quây nằm bên trong lò xo; Lưới quây nằm ngoài lò xo; Lưới gắn vào thảm nhảy (lưới quây không dùng lò xo); Không có lưới quây; Khác
ro-RO: Tipul incintei trambulinei: Plasă de siguranță fără stâlpi/tip arcadă; Plasă de siguranță în interiorul arcurilor; Plasă de siguranță în exteriorul arcurilor; Plasă atașată de suprafața de sărit (fără arcuri); Fără plasă de siguranță; Altele
sl-SI: Vrsta ograje za trampolin: Mreža brez lokov/palic; Mreža znotraj vzmeti; Mreža zunaj vzmeti; Mreža, pritrjena na skakalno podlago (brez vzmeti); Brez mreže; Drugo
ko: 트램폴린 안전망 유형: 아치/무기둥형 인클로저; 스프링 안쪽 인클로저 네트; 스프링 바깥쪽 인클로저 네트; 점프 매트 부착 네트(스프링리스 인클로저); 인클로저 없음; 기타
fr: Type d’enceinte de protection du trampoline: Filet de protection à arche/sans poteau; Filet de protection à l’intérieur des ressorts; Filet de protection à l’extérieur des ressorts; Filet attaché au tapis de saut (protection sans ressort); Sans filet de protection; Autre
ru: Тип защитного ограждения батута: Ограждение без дуг/стоек; Защитная сетка внутри пружин; Защитная сетка снаружи пружин; Сетка прикреплена к прыжковому полотну (без пружин); Без ограждения; Другое
sv: Typ av inhägnad för studsmatta: Skyddsnät utan bågar/stolpar; Skyddsnät innanför fjädrar; Skyddsnät utanför fjädrar; Nät fäst i hoppduk (fjäderlöst skyddsnät); Inget skyddsnät; Övrigt
el: Τύπος περίφραξης τραμπολίνου: Προστατευτικό με αψίδα/χωρίς στύλους; Προστατευτικό δίχτυ εσωτερικά των ελατηρίων; Προστατευτικό δίχτυ εξωτερικά των ελατηρίων; Δίχτυ προσαρτημένο στο στρώμα άλματος (προστατευτικό χωρίς ελατήρια); Χωρίς προστατευτικό; Άλλο
pt-BR: Trampolim tipo de fechamento: Tela de proteção em arco/sem hastes; Rede de proteção interna às molas; Rede de proteção externa às molas; Rede fixada na lona de salto (tela sem molas); Sem tela de proteção; Outro
hr-HR: Vrsta ograđenog prostora za trampolinu: Mreža s lukovima / bez stupova; Mreža unutar opruga; Mreža izvan opruga; Mreža pričvršćena na podlogu (bez opruga); Bez zaštitne mreže; Ostalo
cs: Typ ochranné sítě trampolíny: Ochranná síť s obloukem / bez sloupků; Ochranná síť uvnitř pružin; Ochranná síť vně pružin; Síť připojená ke skákací ploše (ochranná síť bez pružin); Bez ochranné sítě; Jiné
th: ประเภทของรั้วกั้นแทรมโพลีน: โครงตาข่ายแบบโค้ง/ไร้เสา; ตาข่ายด้านในสปริง; ตาข่ายด้านนอกสปริง; ตาข่ายติดกับแผ่นกระโดด (โครงตาข่ายไร้สปริง); ไม่มีตาข่ายกันตก; อื่นๆ
pl: Typ obudowy trampoliny: Siatka z łukami / bez słupków; Siatka wewnętrzna (przed sprężynami); Siatka zewnętrzna (za sprężynami); Siatka przymocowana do maty (bez sprężyn); Bez siatki; Inne
ja: トランポリン囲いタイプ: アーチ / ポールレスエンクロージャー; エンクロージャーネット (スプリング内側); エンクロージャーネット (スプリング外側); ネット付きジャンプマット (スプリングフリーエンクロージャー); エンクロージャーなし; その他
bg-BG: Тип предпазна мрежа за батут: Арка/мрежа без колове; Защитна мрежа отвътре на пружините; Защитна мрежа отвън на пружините; Мрежа, прикрепена към постелката (без пружини); Без мрежа; Друго
da: Type af trampolinindhegning: Buestel/stangløst sikkerhedsnet; Sikkerhedsnet inden for fjedre; Sikkerhedsnet uden for fjedre; Net fastgjort til hoppedug (fjederfrit sikkerhedsnet); Intet sikkerhedsnet; Andet
fi: Trampoliinin suojaverkon tyyppi: Kaari-/tolpaton suojaverkko; Suojaverkko jousien sisäpuolella; Suojaverkko jousien ulkopuolella; Verkko kiinnitetty hyppymattoon (jouseton suojaverkko); Ei suojaverkkoa; Muu
en: Trampoline enclosure type: Arch/pole-less enclosure; Enclosure net inside springs; Enclosure net outside springs; Net attached to jump mat (spring-free enclosure); No enclosure; Other
nl: Trampoline omheiningstype: Veiligheidsnet met boogconstructie/zonder palen; Veiligheidsnet binnen de veren; Veiligheidsnet buiten de veren; Net bevestigd aan springmat (veervrij veiligheidsnet); Geen veiligheidsnet; Overig
nb: Trampolineinnhegningstype: Sikkerhetsnett med bue / uten stenger; Sikkerhetsnett på innsiden av fjærene; Sikkerhetsnett på utsiden av fjærene; Nett festet til hoppeduk (fjærløst nett); Uten sikkerhetsnett; Annet
de: Art der Trampolinumrandung: Bogen-/stangenloses Sicherheitsnetz; Sicherheitsnetz innerhalb der Federn; Sicherheitsnetz außerhalb der Federn; An Sprungmatte befestigtes Netz (federloses Sicherheitsnetz); Kein Sicherheitsnetz; Sonstige
zh-TW: 彈跳床防護網類型: 拱形/無柱護網; 護網在彈簧內側; 護網在彈簧外側; 護網連接跳躍墊 (無彈簧護網); 無護網; 其他
pt-PT: Tipo de rede de proteção do trampolim: Rede sem arco/postes; Rede interior às molas; Rede exterior às molas; Rede fixada à lona de salto (rede sem molas); Sem rede; Outro
es: Tipo de cerramiento para trampolín: Red sin arcos/postes; Red de protección dentro de los resortes; Red de protección por fuera de los resortes; Red adherida a la lona de salto (malla sin resortes); Sin red de protección; Otro
hu: Trambulin védőháló típusa: Íves/rúd nélküli védőháló; Védőháló a rugókon belül; Védőháló a rugókon kívül; Ugrálómatrachoz rögzített háló (rugó nélküli védelem); Nincs védőháló; Egyéb
lt-LT: Batuto uždangos tipas: Tinklas be lankų / stulpelių; Apsauginis tinklas viduje (prieš spyruokles); Apsauginis tinklas išorėje (už spyruoklių); Tinklas pritvirtintas prie šokinėjimo kilimėlio (bemespyruoklis); Be apsauginio tinklo; Kita
tr: Trambolin güvenlik ağı tipi: Kemerli/direksiz koruma ağı; Yay içi koruma ağı; Yay dışı koruma ağı; Zıplama matına bağlı ağ (yaysız koruma ağı); Koruma ağı yok; Diğer
sk-SK: Typ ohradenia trampolíny: Oblúková ochranná sieť / bez tyčí; Ochranná sieť vo vnútri pružín; Ochranná sieť mimo pružín; Sieť pripevnená na skákaciu plochu (sieť bez pružín); Bez ochrannej siete; Iné
zh-CN: 蹦床围栏类型: 拱形/无杆防护网; 弹簧内侧防护网; 弹簧外侧防护网; 防护网连接至跳跃垫（无弹簧防护网）; 无防护网; 其他